Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.050

Judges, clerks, other officers, to comply with requests of administrator.

The judges and clerks of the courts and all other officers, state and local, shall comply with all requests made by the administrator, after approval by the chief justice, for information and statistical data bearing on the state of the dockets of such courts and such other information as may reflect the business transacted by them and the expenditure of public moneys for the maintenance and operation of the judicial system.

[ 1957 c 259 s 5.]